Connecticut, session 2026, HB05124.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Office of Policy
and Management, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for the purpose of fully reimbursing each municipality for the
revenue loss caused by a property tax exemption for veterans pursuant
to subdivision (83) of section 12-81 of the general statutes.